Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Chapter 209A Spousal Abuse or Neglect

209A.010.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to identify victims of domestic violence and abuse and dating violence and abuse, to link those victims to services, and to provide protective or therapeutic services for those who choose to accept them.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 20, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.020.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Dating violence and abuse” has the same meaning as in KRS 456.010;

“Domestic violence and abuse” has the same meaning as in KRS 403.720;

“Law enforcement officer” means a member of a lawfully organized police unit or police force of county, city, or metropolitan government who is responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state, as well as a sheriff, sworn deputy sheriff, campus police officer, law enforcement support personnel, public airport authority security officer, other public and federal peace officer responsible for law enforcement, special local peace officer appointed pursuant to KRS 61.360, school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, and any other enforcement officer as defined by law;

“Professional” means a physician, osteopathic physician, coroner, medical examiner, medical resident, medical intern, chiropractor, nurse, dentist, optometrist, emergency medical technician, paramedic, licensed mental health professional, therapist, cabinet employee, child-care personnel, teacher, school personnel, ordained minister or the denominational equivalent, victim advocate, or any organization or agency employing any of these professionals;

“Victim” means an individual who is or has been abused by a spouse or former spouse or an intimate partner who meets the definition of a member of an unmarried couple as defined in KRS 403.720, or a member of a dating relationship as defined in KRS 456.010; and

“Victim advocate” has the same meaning as in KRS 421.570.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 21, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 243, effective June 26, 2007; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 5, § 13, effective March 11, 2019.

209A.030.
Penalty.

A professional knowingly or wantonly violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor and penalized in accordance with KRS 532.090. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 22, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.040.
Cabinet’s authority to promulgate administrative regulations on general adult services.
[Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 23, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 191, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.045.
Domestic violence shelter fund — Department of Revenue to administer — Cabinet for Health and Family Services to use — Primary service providers.

There is hereby created a trust and agency account in the State Treasury to be known as the domestic violence shelter fund. Each county clerk shall remit to the fund, by the tenth of the month, ten dollars ($10) from each twenty-four dollars ($24) collected during the previous month from the issuance of marriage licenses. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Revenue. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall use the funds for the purpose of providing protective shelter services for domestic violence victims.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall designate one (1) nonprofit corporation in each area development district to serve as the primary service provider and regional planning authority for domestic violence shelter, crisis, and advocacy services in the district in which the designated provider is located.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 161, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 338, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 428, § 35, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 240, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 624, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 295, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 132, § 28, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and renumbered 2017, ch. 191, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.050.
Immunity from civil or criminal liability for acting upon reasonable cause.

Anyone acting upon reasonable cause in complying with the provisions of this chapter shall have immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from such compliance.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 24, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.060.
Privileged relationships not ground for excluding evidence.

Neither the psychotherapist-patient privilege nor the husband-wife privilege shall be a ground for excluding evidence regarding the domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse or the cause thereof in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report pursuant to this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 25, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.070.
Confidentiality of the identity of domestic violence program clients or former clients.

All information that identifies a current or former client of a domestic violence program is confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except as provided by law. The cabinet shall have access to client information relating to any domestic violence program for the limited purpose of monitoring the program.

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 26, effective June 20, 2005; repealed, reenacted, and amended 2017, ch. 191, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.080.
Confidentiality of spousal abuse or neglect investigation information — Exceptions. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 132, § 27, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2017 ch. 191, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.100.
Report by professional
of act of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse
to law enforcement.

Upon the request of a victim, a professional shall
report an act of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and
abuse to a law enforcement officer.

A professional who makes a report under this chapter
shall discuss the report with the victim prior to contacting a law
enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 191, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.110.
Report by professional to law enforcement concerning belief that client’s or patient’s death is related to domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse.

A professional shall report to a law enforcement officer his or her belief that the death of a victim with whom he or she has had a professional interaction is related to domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse.

Nothing in this chapter shall relieve a professional of the duty pursuant to KRS 620.030 to report any known or suspected abuse, neglect, or dependency of a child.

Nothing in this chapter shall relieve a professional of the duty pursuant to KRS 209.030 to report to the cabinet any known or suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a person eighteen (18) years of age or older who because of mental or physical dysfunction is unable to manage his or her own resources, carry out the activity of daily living, or protect himself or herself from neglect, exploitation, or a hazardous or abusive situation without assistance from others.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 191, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.120.
Duty of law enforcement to provide assistance as required under KRS 403.785 and 456.090 — Use of JC-3 form.

If a law enforcement officer receives a report of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse, the officer shall use all reasonable means to provide assistance as required under KRS 403.785 and 456.090.

A law enforcement officer who responds to a report of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse shall use the JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, as provided by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet to document any information or injuries related to the domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse.

A completed JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, shall be kept in the records of the law enforcement officer’s agency of employment.

If the JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, includes information that only relates to a victim as defined in KRS 209A.020, the form shall not be forwarded to the cabinet.

If the JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, includes information on known or suspected child abuse or neglect or the abuse or neglect of an elderly or disabled adult, the form shall be forwarded to the cabinet.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 191, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

209A.130.
Educational materials to be provided suspected victim of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse — Availability of online materials.

If a professional has reasonable cause to believe that a victim with whom he or she has had a professional interaction has experienced domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse, the professional shall provide the victim with educational materials related to domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse including information about how he or she may access regional domestic violence programs under KRS 209A.045 or rape crisis centers under KRS 211.600 and information about how to access protective orders.

A nonprofit corporation designated by the cabinet pursuant to KRS 209A.045 as a primary service provider for domestic violence shelter, crisis, and advocacy services in the district in which the provider is located shall make the educational materials required under this section available on its Web site or in print form for professionals to provide to possible victims of domestic violence and abuse or dating violence and abuse.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 191, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.